Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1166
Hearing officer; subpoena witnesses; fees and expenses; failure to respond; contempt.

The hearing officer has the power by subpoena to compel the appearance of witnesses and the production of any relevant evidence. Any witness compelled to attend or produce evidence shall be entitled to the fees and expenses allowed in district court. Any failure to respond to such subpoena shall be certified by the hearing officer to the district court of Lancaster County for enforcement or for punishment for contempt of the district court.

Laws 1978, LB 871, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-665;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 53;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3353;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 848.